Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.640.010

Purpose—Discrimination prohibited.

Inequality in the educational opportunities afforded women and girls at all levels of the public schools in Washington state is a breach of Article XXXI, section 1, Amendment 61, of the Washington state Constitution, requiring equal treatment of all citizens regardless of sex. This violation of rights has had a deleterious effect on the individuals affected and on society. Recognizing the benefit to our state and nation of equal educational opportunities for all students, discrimination on the basis of sex for any student in grades K-12 of the Washington public schools is prohibited.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.85.010.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 226: "If any provision of this act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 226 s 8.]